src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_utf8_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 308 Y 45
SFX 308 0 ُّهُ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّهُما/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّهُم/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّها/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّهُنَّ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 َّهُ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 َّهُما/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 َّهُم/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 َّها/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 َّهُنَّ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ِّهِ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ِّهِما/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ِّهِم/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ِّها/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ِّهِنَّ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّكَ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّكِ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّكُما/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّكُم/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّكُنَّ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 َّنِي/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 َّنا/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ِّنِي/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ِّنا/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّماهُ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّماهُما/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّماهُم/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّماها/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّماهُنَّ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمانِي/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمانا/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمُوهُ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمُوهُما/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمُوهُم/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمُوها/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمُوهُنَّ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمُونِي/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّمُونا/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّنَّهُ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّنَّهُما/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّنَّهُم/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّنَّها/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّنَّهُنَّ/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّنَّنِي/160 . 226
SFX 308 0 ُّنَّنا/160 . 226
SFX 242 Y 13
SFX 242 0 َتا/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاهُ/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاهُما/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاهُم/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاها/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاهُنَّ/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاكَ/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاكِ/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاكُما/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاكُم/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتاكُنَّ/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتايَ/158 . 281
SFX 242 0 َتانا/158 . 281
SFX 570 Y 5
SFX 570 0 كَ/185 . 239
SFX 570 0 كِ/185 . 239
SFX 570 0 كُما/185 . 239
SFX 570 0 كُم/185 . 239
SFX 570 0 كُنَّ/185 . 239
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 0 ُونَ/177 . 259
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 0 َتانِ/158 . 230
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 0/186 . 229
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 ات/156 . 256
SFX 318 Y 5
SFX 318 0 ه/187 . 236
SFX 318 0 هما/187 . 236
SFX 318 0 هم/187 . 236
SFX 318 0 ها/187 . 236
SFX 318 0 هنَّ/187 . 236
SFX 319 Y 5
SFX 319 0 كَ/187 . 239
SFX 319 0 كِ/187 . 239
SFX 319 0 كُما/187 . 239
SFX 319 0 كُم/187 . 239
SFX 319 0 كُنَّ/187 . 239
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 نِ/147 . 260
SFX 133 Y 12
SFX 133 0 َهُ/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َهُما/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َهُم/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َها/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َهُنَّ/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َكَ/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َكِ/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َكُما/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َكُم/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َكُنَّ/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َنِي/146 . 289
SFX 133 0 َنا/146 . 289
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 ا/151 . 242
SFX 47 Y 12
SFX 47 0 َهُ/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َهُما/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َهُم/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َها/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َهُنَّ/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َكَ/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َكِ/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َكُما/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َكُم/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َكُنَّ/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َنِي/152 . 289
SFX 47 0 َنا/152 . 289
SFX 135 Y 12
SFX 135 0 اهُ/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اهُما/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اهُم/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اها/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اهُنَّ/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اكَ/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اكِ/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اكُما/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اكُم/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 اكُنَّ/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 انِي/146 . 290
SFX 135 0 انا/146 . 290
SFX 559 Y 2
SFX 559 0 نِي/188 . 231
SFX 559 0 نا/188 . 231
SFX 138 Y 2
SFX 138 0 َت/146 . 291
SFX 138 0 َتا/146 . 291
SFX 49 Y 12
SFX 49 0 اهُ/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اهُما/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اهُم/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اها/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اهُنَّ/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اكَ/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اكِ/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اكُما/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اكُم/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 اكُنَّ/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 انِي/152 . 290
SFX 49 0 انا/152 . 290
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 0 َة/162 . 246
SFX 52 Y 2
SFX 52 0 َت/152 . 291
SFX 52 0 َتا/152 . 291
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 ِي/162 . 292
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 0 ِينَ/147 . 266
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 ات/162 . 256
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 0/178 . 229
SFX 40 Y 13
SFX 40 0 ِي/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيهِ/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيهِما/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيهِم/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيها/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيهِنَّ/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيكَ/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيكِ/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيكُما/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيكُم/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيكُنَّ/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِيَّ/152 . 251
SFX 40 0 ِينا/152 . 251
SFX 490 Y 7
SFX 490 0 اهُ/145 . 234
SFX 490 0 اهُما/145 . 234
SFX 490 0 اهُم/145 . 234
SFX 490 0 اها/145 . 234
SFX 490 0 اهُنَّ/145 . 234
SFX 490 0 انِي/145 . 234
SFX 490 0 انا/145 . 234
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 0 آت/147 . 293
SFX 487 Y 7
SFX 487 0 نِهِ/189 . 294
SFX 487 0 نِهِما/189 . 294
SFX 487 0 نِهِم/189 . 294
SFX 487 0 نِها/189 . 294
SFX 487 0 نِهِنَّ/189 . 294
SFX 487 0 نِنِي/189 . 294
SFX 487 0 نِنا/189 . 294
SFX 491 Y 5
SFX 491 0 اكَ/145 . 295
SFX 491 0 اكِ/145 . 295
SFX 491 0 اكُما/145 . 295
SFX 491 0 اكُم/145 . 295
SFX 491 0 اكُنَّ/145 . 295
SFX 475 Y 7
SFX 475 0 نِهِ/190 . 294
SFX 475 0 نِهِما/190 . 294
SFX 475 0 نِهِم/190 . 294
SFX 475 0 نِها/190 . 294
SFX 475 0 نِهِنَّ/190 . 294
SFX 475 0 نِنِي/190 . 294
SFX 475 0 نِنا/190 . 294
SFX 488 Y 5
SFX 488 0 نِكَ/189 . 296
SFX 488 0 نِكِ/189 . 296
SFX 488 0 نِكُما/189 . 296
SFX 488 0 نِكُم/189 . 296
SFX 488 0 نِكُنَّ/189 . 296
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 انِ/145 . 240
SFX 476 Y 5
SFX 476 0 نِكَ/190 . 296
SFX 476 0 نِكِ/190 . 296
SFX 476 0 نِكُما/190 . 296
SFX 476 0 نِكُم/190 . 296
SFX 476 0 نِكُنَّ/190 . 296
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 نِ/146 . 260
SFX 192 Y 2
SFX 192 0 اتِ/147 . 254
SFX 192 0 اتِ/147 . 254
SFX 327 Y 5
SFX 327 0 ه/191 . 236
SFX 327 0 هما/191 . 236
SFX 327 0 هم/191 . 236
SFX 327 0 ها/191 . 236
SFX 327 0 هنَّ/191 . 236
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 َتَيْنِ/146 . 276
SFX 328 Y 5
SFX 328 0 كَ/191 . 239
SFX 328 0 كِ/191 . 239
SFX 328 0 كُما/191 . 239
SFX 328 0 كُم/191 . 239
SFX 328 0 كُنَّ/191 . 239
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 0 ا/146 . 297
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 نا/152 . 298
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 0 اتُ/147 . 299
SFX 401 Y 1
SFX 401 0 0/151 . 268
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 ٍ/169 . 300
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 0 ِّي/152 . 301
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 0 ا/146 . 302
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 آت/144 . 293
SFX 340 Y 2
SFX 340 0 نِي/186 . 231
SFX 340 0 نا/186 . 231
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 0/169 . 229
SFX 163 Y 5
SFX 163 0 كَ/146 . 303
SFX 163 0 كِ/146 . 303
SFX 163 0 كُما/146 . 303
SFX 163 0 كُم/146 . 303
SFX 163 0 كُنَّ/146 . 303
SFX 224 Y 44
SFX 224 0 ه/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 هما/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 هم/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ها/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 هنَّ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 كَ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 كِ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 كُما/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 كُم/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 كُنَّ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 نا/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُهُ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُهُما/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُهُم/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُها/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُهُنَّ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُكَ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُكِ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُكُما/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُكُم/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُكُنَّ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ُنا/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َهُ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َهُما/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َهُم/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َها/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َهُنَّ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َكَ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َكِ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َكُما/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َكُم/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َكُنَّ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 َنا/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِهِ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِهِما/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِهِم/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِها/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِهِنَّ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِكَ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِكِ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِكُما/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِكُم/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِكُنَّ/169 . 304
SFX 224 0 ِنا/169 . 304
SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 0 ِ/169 . 224
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 َةً/152 . 305
SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132 0 َ/146 . 306
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 َةٍ/152 . 272
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 َةٌ/152 . 307
SFX 140 Y 2
SFX 140 0 ْنَ/146 . 308
SFX 140 0 ْنا/146 . 308
SFX 300 Y 24
SFX 300 0 َتْهُ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْهُما/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْهُم/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْها/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْهُنَّ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْكَ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْكِ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْكُما/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْكُم/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْكُنَّ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْنِي/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتْنا/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاهُ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاهُما/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاهُم/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاها/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاهُنَّ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاكَ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاكِ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاكُما/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاكُم/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتاكُنَّ/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتانِي/160 . 274
SFX 300 0 َتانا/160 . 274
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 0 َةِ/156 . 270
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 0/192 . 229
SFX 144 Y 6
SFX 144 0 ْتُ/146 . 309
SFX 144 0 ْتَ/146 . 309
SFX 144 0 ْتِ/146 . 309
SFX 144 0 ْتُما/146 . 309
SFX 144 0 ْتُم/146 . 309
SFX 144 0 ْتُنَّ/146 . 309
SFX 502 Y 7
SFX 502 0 اهُ/155 . 234
SFX 502 0 اهُما/155 . 234
SFX 502 0 اهُم/155 . 234
SFX 502 0 اها/155 . 234
SFX 502 0 اهُنَّ/155 . 234
SFX 502 0 انِي/155 . 234
SFX 502 0 انا/155 . 234
SFX 387 Y 1
SFX 387 0 وْا/193 . 257
SFX 330 Y 5
SFX 330 0 ه/180 . 236
SFX 330 0 هما/180 . 236
SFX 330 0 هم/180 . 236
SFX 330 0 ها/180 . 236
SFX 330 0 هنَّ/180 . 236
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 0 0/194 . 229
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 0 وْا/195 . 257
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 َةَ/152 . 310
SFX 503 Y 5
SFX 503 0 اكَ/155 . 295
SFX 503 0 اكِ/155 . 295
SFX 503 0 اكُما/155 . 295
SFX 503 0 اكُم/155 . 295
SFX 503 0 اكُنَّ/155 . 295
SFX 331 Y 5
SFX 331 0 كَ/180 . 239
SFX 331 0 كِ/180 . 239
SFX 331 0 كُما/180 . 239
SFX 331 0 كُم/180 . 239
SFX 331 0 كُنَّ/180 . 239
SFX 504 Y 1
SFX 504 0 انِ/155 . 240
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 0/146 . 311
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 ا/168 . 242
SFX 35 Y 45
SFX 35 0 َته/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتهما/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتهم/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتها/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتهنَّ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتكَ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتكِ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتكُما/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتكُم/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتكُنَّ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِي/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتنا/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُهُ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُهُما/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُهُم/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُها/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُهُنَّ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُكَ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُكِ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُكُما/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُكُم/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُكُنَّ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتُنا/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَهُ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَهُما/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَهُم/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَها/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَهُنَّ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَكَ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَكِ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَكُما/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَكُم/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَكُنَّ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتَنا/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِهِ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِهِما/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِهِم/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِها/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِهِنَّ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِكَ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِكِ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِكُما/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِكُم/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِكُنَّ/152 . 282
SFX 35 0 َتِنا/152 . 282
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 0 َةِ/152 . 270
SFX 126 Y 13
SFX 126 0 ِي/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيهِ/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيهِما/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيهِم/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيها/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيهِنَّ/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيكَ/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيكِ/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيكُما/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيكُم/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيكُنَّ/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِيَّ/146 . 251
SFX 126 0 ِينا/146 . 251
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 َيْنِ/159 . 277
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 0 0/196 . 229
SFX 354 Y 7
SFX 354 0 ِيهِ/197 . 312
SFX 354 0 ِيهِما/197 . 312
SFX 354 0 ِيهِم/197 . 312
SFX 354 0 ِيها/197 . 312
SFX 354 0 ِيهِنَّ/197 . 312
SFX 354 0 ِينِي/197 . 312
SFX 354 0 ِينا/197 . 312
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 0/147 . 229
SFX 99 Y 13
SFX 99 0 0/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 هُ/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 هُما/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 هُم/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 ها/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 هُنَّ/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 كَ/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 كِ/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 كُما/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 كُم/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 كُنَّ/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 يَ/146 . 313
SFX 99 0 نا/146 . 313
SFX 367 Y 7
SFX 367 0 وْنَهُ/150 . 248
SFX 367 0 وْنَهُما/150 . 248
SFX 367 0 وْنَهُم/150 . 248
SFX 367 0 وْنَها/150 . 248
SFX 367 0 وْنَهُنَّ/150 . 248
SFX 367 0 وْنَنِي/150 . 248
SFX 367 0 وْنَنا/150 . 248
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 َةُ/152 . 314
SFX 368 Y 5
SFX 368 0 وْنَكَ/150 . 252
SFX 368 0 وْنَكِ/150 . 252
SFX 368 0 وْنَكُما/150 . 252
SFX 368 0 وْنَكُم/150 . 252
SFX 368 0 وْنَكُنَّ/150 . 252
SFX 526 Y 7
SFX 526 0 اهُ/168 . 234
SFX 526 0 اهُما/168 . 234
SFX 526 0 اهُم/168 . 234
SFX 526 0 اها/168 . 234
SFX 526 0 اهُنَّ/168 . 234
SFX 526 0 انِي/168 . 234
SFX 526 0 انا/168 . 234
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 0/198 . 229
SFX 583 Y 2
SFX 583 0 نِي/199 . 231
SFX 583 0 نا/199 . 231
